Utah statutes.
70A-2a-403.   Retraction of anticipatory repudiation.
(1)  Until the repudiating party's next performance is due, the repudiating
party can retract the repudiation unless, since the repudiation, the aggrieved
party has cancelled the lease contract or materially changed the aggrieved
party's position or otherwise indicated that the aggrieved party considers the
repudiation final.
(2)  Retraction may be by any method that clearly indicates to the aggrieved
party that the repudiating party intends to perform under the lease contract
and includes any assurance demanded under Section 70A-2a-401.
(3)  Retraction reinstates a repudiating party's rights under a lease contract
with due excuse and allowance to the aggrieved party for any delay occasioned
by the repudiation.
